Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 41

Distribution Without Administration

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1983, No. 133, § 2, provided that the provisions of the act shall be applicable to the estates of persons who die subsequent to the effective date of the act.

Effective Dates. Acts 1951, No. 255, § 15: Mar. 19, 1951. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly has ascertained that there is a likelihood of misconstruction of certain provisions of the Probate Code, and that an urgent need exists for clarification thereof and certain additions thereto in order that the law relating to proceedings in probate may be construed and administered in a uniform manner throughout the State, in accordance with the legislative intent; for the accomplishment of which purposes this Act is adopted. An emergency is therefore declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, welfare and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 620, § 16: July 1, 1975.

Acts 1981, No. 714, § 75: Mar. 25, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that existing law relating to such matters as homestead, dower, curtesy, statutory allowances payable from a decedent's estate, and the right of a surviving spouse to take against the will of a decedent, do not in all circumstances provide for equal treatment between the sexes, that the constitutionality of such existing law has been drawn into question by decisions of the United States Supreme Court and the Arkansas Supreme Court, and that there is an urgent need to insure that the law provides equality in the property rights and interests of married persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 133, § 4: Feb. 10, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that present law requires all probate estates with a value in excess of $15,000 to be distributed by a personal representative appointed by the court; that the $15,000 maximum is obsolete and should be immediately increased; and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish the same. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2001, No. 1229, § 2: Apr. 2, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that Act 992 of 1999 amended Arkansas Code 28-41-101 to provide that if a small estate contains real property the distributee must include in the notice of the decedent's death a statement requiring all persons having claims against the estate to exhibit them within three (3) months, instead of six (6) months, after the date of the first publication of the notice; that Arkansas Code 28-41-102 also contained the six (6) month provision for filing claims and that it was inadvertently not changed to three (3) months; that this act cures the same by making 28-41-102 consistent with 28-41-101; and that this act should become effective as soon as possible in order to eliminate any confusion regarding whether the statute of limitations involved in those two statutes is six (6) months or three (3) months. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

28-41-101. Collection of small estates by distributee.

The distributee of an estate may collect and distribute the assets of an estate under this section without the appointment of a personal representative when:

No petition for the appointment of a personal representative is pending or has been granted;

Forty-five (45) days have elapsed since the death of the decedent;

The value, less encumbrances, of all property owned by the decedent at the time of death does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

When calculating the value of all property owned by the decedent under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section, the value of the decedent's homestead and the value of any statutory allowances for the benefit of a spouse or minor children, if any, shall be excluded;

One (1) or more of the distributees files an affidavit with the probate clerk of the circuit court of the county of proper venue for administration stating:

That there are no unpaid claims or demands against the decedent or his or her estate, that the Department of Human Services furnished no federal or state benefits to the decedent, or, that if such benefits have been furnished, the department has been reimbursed in accordance with state and federal laws and regulations;

An itemized description and valuation of the personal property and a legal description and valuation of any real property of the decedent, including the homestead;

The names and addresses of persons having possession of the personal property and the names and addresses of any persons possessing or residing on any real property of the decedent; and

The names, addresses, and relationship to the decedent of the persons entitled to and who will receive the property; and

A copy of the affidavit certified by the clerk is furnished to any person owing any money, having custody of any property, or acting as registrar or transfer agent of any evidence of interest, indebtedness, property, or right.

The clerk shall file the affidavit, assign it a number, and index it as required by § 28-1-108(1).

He or she shall make a charge of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for filing the affidavit and five dollars ($5.00) for each certified copy.

An order of the court or other proceeding is not necessary.

An additional fee shall not be charged if a will is attached to the affidavit.

If an estate collected under this section contains real property, in order to allow for claims against the estate to be presented, the distributee shall cause a notice of the decedent's death and the filing of an affidavit for the collection of his or her estate to be published within thirty (30) days after the affidavit has been filed.

The notice shall be in substantially the following form:

“In the Circuit Court ofCounty, Arkansas

Probate Division

In the Matter of the Estate of, Deceased. No.

Name of decedent

Last known address

Date of death

On, an affidavit for collection of small estate by distributee was filed with respect to the estate of, deceased, with the clerk of the probate division of the circuit court ofCounty, Arkansas, under Ark. Code Ann. §28-41-101.

All persons having claims against the estate must exhibit them, properly verified, to the distributee or his or her attorney within three (3) months from the date of the first publication of this notice or they shall be forever barred and precluded from any benefit of the estate.

The name, mailing address, and telephone number of the distributee or distributee's attorney is:

This notice first published, 20...”.

Publication of the notice shall be as provided in §§ 28-1-112(b)(4) and 28-40-111(a)(4).

Publisher's Notes. Acts 2015, No. 526 became law without the Governor's signature.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment by No. 289 subdivided former (b)(1); and substituted “five dollars ($5.00)” for “three dollars ($3.00)” in (b)(1)(B).

The 2011 amendment by No. 761, in (b)(2)(A), substituted “the distributee shall cause” for “may cause, promptly after the affidavit has been filed” and added “within thirty (30) days after the affidavit has been filed.”

The 2013 amendment rewrote (b)(2)(B) and made stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendment deleted “The legal description of the real property listed in the affidavit is as follows” in (b)(2)(B).

The 2017 amendment substituted “may collect and distribute the assets of an estate under this section” for “shall be entitled thereto” in the introductory language of (a); rewrote (a)(3) and the introductory language of (a)(4); and, in (a)(5), substituted “A copy of the affidavit certified by the clerk is furnished” for “There is furnished” and deleted “a copy of the affidavit certified by the clerk” at the end.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey — Probate, 10 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 599.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Probate Law, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 631.

Circuit court erred in granting the declaratory judgment in favor of the heirs and ordering the decedent's land to be sold and the proceeds divided accordingly, where the circuit court's ruling was based on an erroneous interpretation and application of §28-40-104; because the small-estate procedure was excepted from the requirements of §28-40-104 and this section, the issue of whether the beneficiary commenced a probate proceeding was irrelevant.Osborn v. Bryant, 2009 Ark. 358, 324 S.W.3d 687 (2009).

Heir's failure to act in substantial compliance with the Probate Code required the court to hold that her disposition of the property was void; she was never appointed as administrator, the decedent's will was never admitted or declared valid, and appellants never received notice of the collection of the small estate, and the administrator's deed was void.Bryant v. Osborn, 2014 Ark. 143 (2014).

Notice took the form recommended by one statute, and the essence of the notice was that one heir was opening the decedent's estate, but the actual probate proceeding she pursued was for the collection of a small estate, and the notice required for that is found in another statute, and appellants testified that they did not receive personal notice, and this testimony was not actually disputed; the trial court clearly erred when it found that the heir satisfied the statutory procedures for collection of a small estate.Bryant v. Osborn, 2014 Ark. 143 (2014).

Alleged granddaughter of a decedent was not entitled to relief under Ark. R. Civ. P. 60 from the declaration at the request of the decedent's niece that, inter alia, the alleged granddaughter was not an heir to the estate, as the alleged granddaughter had merely reargued the merits of the case.Cotton v. Robinson, 2015 Ark. App. 451 (2015).

Cited: Woolsey v. Nationwide Ins. Co., 697 F. Supp. 1053 (W.D. Ark. 1988); Woolsey v. Nationwide Ins. Co., 884 F.2d 381 (8th Cir. 1989).

The person making payment, transfer, or delivery pursuant to the affidavit described in § 28-41-101 shall be released to the same extent as if made to a personal representative of the decedent, and he or she shall not be required to see to the application thereof or to inquire into the truth of any statement in the affidavit.

(1)The distributee to whom payment, transfer, or delivery is made, as trustee, shall be answerable to any person having a prior right and shall be accountable to any personal representative thereafter appointed.

Nothing in this section shall affect or prevent any action or proceeding to enforce any mortgage, pledge, or other lien arising under contract or statute upon the property of the estate.

If the person to whom the affidavit is delivered refuses to pay, transfer, or deliver the property as provided in this section, the property may be recovered or delivery compelled in an action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction for such a purpose by or in behalf of the distributee entitled to the property upon proof of the facts required to be stated in the affidavit.

If the distributee who is entitled to the transfer or delivery of real property complies with the affidavit and notice requirements under § 28-41-101, the three-month period required under § 28-41-101 lapses, and a claim is not presented to the distributee within the three-month period or all claims against the estate that were presented to the distributee within the three-month period are satisfied, then the distributee shall:

Be authorized to issue to himself or herself a deed of distribution for the real property of the decedent as if made by a personal representative of the decedent; and

Deliver notice of the transfer of ownership to the county assessor of each county where the real property is located.

If a claim against an estate is presented to the distributee of the estate within three (3) months from the date of the first publication of the notice required under § 28-41-101, then the distributee shall file a petition for the administration of the estate in accordance with § 28-40-101 et seq.

A distributee is not required to comply with subdivision (e)(1) of this section if the claim against the estate is satisfied without using property owned by the decedent at the time of death.

If a claim against the estate is satisfied in the manner described under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section, the claimant shall present to the distributee an acknowledgement of the satisfied claim.

If a petition for the administration of an estate is filed as required under subdivision (e)(1) of this section, then a new notice shall be published in accordance with § 28-40-111.

The publication of notice filed by a distributee in accordance with § 28-41-101 is insufficient notice with regard to a petition for the administration of an estate filed as required under this subsection.

The distributee shall pay a new filing fee when a petition for the administration of an estate is filed as required under this subsection.

A distributee is not entitled to a credit or refund of the fee paid to file the affidavit of small estate required under § 28-41-101.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment subdivided and rewrote (d).

The 2017 amendment rewrote the introductory language of (d); and added (e).

Cited: Woolsey v. Nationwide Ins. Co., 697 F. Supp. 1053 (W.D. Ark. 1988).

Either with or without administration, if the court shall determine upon petition of an interested person that the personal property owned by a decedent at the time of his or her death does not exceed that to which the surviving spouse, if any, or minor children, if any, are by law entitled free of debt, as dower or curtesy and statutory allowances, then the court may enter an order vesting the entire estate in the surviving spouse and minor children, or the surviving spouse or minor children.

The statutory allowances payable to or for the benefit of the minor children of the decedent may be paid to the surviving parent without the interposition of a guardian if the surviving parent has custody of the minor children.

The petition may be granted without notice or upon such notice as the court may direct.

(1)The order shall specifically describe the property vested thereby.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 66; 1951, No. 255, § 5; 1967, No. 287, § 4; 1975, No. 620, § 6; 1979, No. 641, § 1; 1981, No. 714, § 67; 1983, No. 133, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2127; Acts 1987, No. 163, § 1; 1989, No. 960, § 1; 1993, No. 415, § 3; 1993, No. 687, § 1; 1999, No. 992, § 1; 2001, No. 1809, § 8; 2003, No. 1185, § 278; 2003, No. 1765, § 38; 2005, No. 899, § 1; 2011, No. 289, § 1; 2011, No. 761, § 1; 2013, No. 230, § 1; 2015, No. 526, § 1; 2017, No. 649, § 1.

28-41-102. Payment, transfers, or deliveries pursuant to affidavit.

However, if notice to creditors of the decedent's death and the collection of his or her estate is published as provided by §28-41-101, all claims as to real property within the estate, in any event, shall be forever barred at the end of three (3) months after the date of the first publication of the first notice.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 67; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2128; Acts 1993, No. 687, § 2; 2001, No. 1229, § 1; 2011, No. 761, § 2; 2017, No. 1021, §§ 1, 2.

28-41-103. Petition and order for no administration.

The order, to the extent of the property specifically described in the order, until revoked, shall constitute sufficient legal authority to all persons owing any money, having custody of any property, or acting as registrar or transfer agent of any evidence of interest, indebtedness, property, or right belonging to the decedent and to persons purchasing or otherwise dealing with the property, for payment or transfer to the persons described in the order as entitled to receive the property.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 68; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2129.

28-41-104. Proceedings to revoke order.

At any time within one (1) year after the making of an order as provided in §28-41-103, the court, either for good cause shown upon petition of an interested person or upon its own motion, may set the order aside.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 69; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2130.